Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 50-73.9.
Nature of business.

A limited partnership may carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Law Review.

For article, “The Virginia Land Trust — An Overlooked Title Holding Device for Investment, Business and Estate Planning Purposes,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 73 (1973).

§ 50-73.10.
Business transactions of partner with partnership.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect thereto as a person who is not a partner.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.10:1.
Unlawful to transact or offer to transact business as a limited partnership unless authorized; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transact business in the Commonwealth as a limited partnership or to offer or advertise to transact business in the Commonwealth as a limited partnership unless the alleged limited partnership is either a domestic limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2007, c. 631.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).